Florida, session 2026, SB1052.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 103 104 Section 1.âSubsection (9) of section 251.001, Florida 105 Statutes, is amended to read: 106 251.001âFlorida State Guard Act.â 107 (9)âREIMBURSEMENT, BENEFIT, AND COMPENSATION.â 108 (a)âThe division shall reimburse members of the Florida 109 State Guard for per diem and travel expenses incurred to attend 110 required training or in the course of active service as provided 111 in s. 112.061. 112 (b)âMembers of the Florida State Guard may be compensated 113 for time spent training or in the course of active service at 114 rates established by the director, subject to appropriation. 115 (c)âA member of the Florida State Guard may not make any 116 purchase or enter into any contract or agreement for purchases 117 or services as a charge against the state without the authority 118 of the director. 119 (d)âAs a benefit to the active members of the Florida State 120 Guard, subject to approval by the director of the Division of 121 the State Guard, each Florida College System institution and 122 state university shall waive tuition and fees for active members 123 of the Florida State Guard to enroll for up to 6 credit hours of 124 courses per term on a space-available basis. 125 Section 2.âSection 413.0114, Florida Statutes, is created 126 to read: 127 413.0114âConsumer disclosure for blind-related services.â 128 (1)âAny individual, business, nonprofit, or other entity 129 offering fee-based services to individuals who are blind or 130 visually impaired shall, before entering into a contract or 131 accepting payment, disclose in writing whether equivalent or 132 substantially similar services may be available at no cost 133 through the Division of Blind Services or another public agency. 134 (2)âThe written disclosure must: 135 (a)âBe provided in plain language and, upon request, in an 136 accessible format, such as braille, large print, or audio. 137 (b)âInclude contact information for the Division of Blind 138 Services. 139 (c)âBe signed or electronically acknowledged by the 140 consumer or his or her representative. 141 (3)âA violation of this section constitutes an unfair or 142 deceptive trade practice under part II of chapter 501 and is 143 subject to penalties and enforcement as provided therein. 144 (4)âThe Department of Education may adopt rules to 145 implement this section. 146 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 413.208, Florida 147 Statutes, is amended to read: 148 413.208âService providers; quality assurance; fitness for 149 responsibilities; background screening.â 150 (1)âService providers must apply to register with the 151 division. To qualify for approval registration, The division 152 must ensure that the a service provider must maintain maintains 153 an internal system of quality assurance, have has proven 154 functional systems, meet the minimum qualifications, and be is 155 subject to a due-diligence inquiry as to its fitness to 156 undertake service responsibilities. 157 (a)âThe division shall establish minimum qualifications for 158 service providers. The division may approve or deny any service 159 provider application. The division also shall establish an 160 annual application period for service providers to submit 161 applications. Beginning January 1, 2027, only service providers 162 that meet the minimum qualifications established by the division 163 and that have been approved to provide employment-related 164 services to individuals with disabilities may participate in the 165 vocational rehabilitation program. 166 (b)âThe division shall develop and make publicly available 167 an annual report of service provider effectiveness which 168 includes an evaluation system measuring the effectiveness of all 169 service providers that are approved by the division to provide 170 employment-related services to individuals with disabilities. 171 (c)âIn order to maintain approved status with the division, 172 service providers must meet minimum standards of effectiveness 173 in the provision of vocational rehabilitation services, 174 including placement of individuals in competitive and integrated 175 employment. 176 (d)âRates for vocational rehabilitation services must be 177 allocable, reasonable, and necessary, as determined by the 178 division. 179 Section 4.âSubsection (3) of section 1004.06, Florida 180 Statutes, is amended to read: 181 1004.06âProhibited expenditures.â 182 (3)âSubsection (2) does not prohibit programs, campus 183 activities, or functions required for compliance with general or 184 federal laws or regulations; for obtaining or retaining 185 institutional or discipline-specific accreditation with the 186 approval of either the State Board of Education or the Board of 187 Governors; or for access programs for military veterans, Pell 188 Grant recipients, first generation college students, 189 nontraditional students, â2+2â transfer students from the 190 Florida College System, students from low-income families, or 191 students with unique abilities. 192 Section 5.âSection 1004.072, Florida Statutes, is created 193 to read: 194 1004.072âAdmission of students in public postsecondary 195 institutions.âA Florida College System institution or a state 196 university may admit as a student only an individual who is a 197 citizen of the United States or who is lawfully present therein. 198 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 199 1004.93, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (c) is 200 added to that subsection, to read: 201 1004.93âAdult general education.â 202 (1) 203 (b)âIt is further intended that adult general education 204 programs offered by a public school district, a Florida College 205 System institution, or a state-funded community-based 206 organization be available to individuals who meet all of the 207 following requirements: 208 1.âAre 16 years of age or older. 209 2.âAre not currently enrolled in secondary school. 210 3.âDo not have a high school diploma or its equivalent. 211 4.âWant to learn to speak, read, and write the English 212 language. 213 5.âAre a United States citizen or lawfully present in the 214 United States. 215 (c)âIt is further intended that educational opportunities 216 be available for adults who have earned a diploma or high school 217 equivalency diploma but who lack the basic skills necessary to 218 function effectively in everyday situations, to enter the job 219 market, or to enter career certificate instruction. 220 Section 7.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 221 1004.933, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 222 1004.933âGraduation Alternative to Traditional Education 223 (GATE) Program.â 224 (4)âPAYMENT WAIVER; ELIGIBILITY.â 225 (b)âTo be eligible for participation in the GATE Program, a 226 student must: 227 1.âNot have earned a standard high school diploma pursuant 228 to s. 1003.4282 or a high school equivalency diploma pursuant to 229 s. 1003.435 before enrolling in the GATE Program; 230 2.âHave been withdrawn from high school; 231 3.âBe a resident of this state as defined in s. 1009.21(1); 232 4.âBe 16 to 21 years of age at the time of initial 233 enrollment, provided that a student who is 16 or 17 years of age 234 has withdrawn from school enrollment pursuant to the 235 requirements and safeguards in s. 1003.21(1)(c); 236 5.âSelect the adult secondary education program and career 237 education program of his or her choice at the time of admission 238 to the GATE Program, provided that the career education program 239 is included on the Master Credentials List under s. 445.004(4). 240 The student may not change the requested pathway after 241 enrollment, except that, if necessary for the student, the 242 student may enroll in an adult basic education program prior to 243 enrolling in the adult secondary education program; 244 6.âMaintain a 2.0 GPA for career and technical education 245 coursework; and 246 7.âNotwithstanding s. 1003.435(4), complete the programs 247 under subparagraph 5. within 3 years after his or her initial 248 enrollment unless the institution determines that an extension 249 is warranted due to extenuating circumstances; and 250 8.âComplete at least 300 hours of volunteer service, paid 251 work experience, or a combination of both, before participation 252 in the program, as approved by the GATE Program provider or the 253 Department of Education. The hours of service or paid work must 254 be documented in writing, and the document must be signed by the 255 student, the studentâs parent or guardian if under 18 years of 256 age, and a representative of each organization for which the 257 student performed the volunteer service or paid work. 258 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 259 1005.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 260 1005.06âInstitutions not under the jurisdiction or purview 261 of the commission.â 262 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in law, the following 263 institutions are not under the jurisdiction or purview of the 264 commission and are not required to obtain licensure: 265 (b)âAny college or, school, or course licensed or approved 266 for establishment and operation by another state agency. 267 Colleges or schools approved by another state agency to offer 268 one or more courses or programs under part I of chapter 464, 269 chapter 466, or chapter 475, or any other chapter of the Florida 270 Statutes may not qualify for exemption from the commissionâs 271 jurisdiction under this subsection requiring licensing or 272 approval as defined in this chapter. 273 Section 9.âSection 1006.71, Florida Statutes, is amended to 274 read: 275 1006.71âEquality Gender equity in intercollegiate 276 athletics.â 277 (1)âPENALTIES FOR FAILURE TO COMPLY GENDER EQUITY PLAN.â 278 (a)âEach Florida College System institution and state 279 university shall develop a gender equity plan pursuant to s. 280 1000.05. 281 (b)âThe plan shall include consideration of equity in 282 sports offerings, participation, availability of facilities, 283 scholarship offerings, and funds allocated for administration, 284 recruitment, comparable coaching, publicity and promotion, and 285 other support costs. 286 (c)âThe Commissioner of Education shall annually assess the 287 progress of each Florida College System institutionâs plan and 288 advise the State Board of Education and the Legislature 289 regarding compliance. 290 (d)âThe Chancellor of the State University System shall 291 annually assess the progress of each state universityâs plan and 292 advise the Board of Governors and the Legislature regarding 293 compliance. 294 (e)âEach board of trustees of a Florida College System 295 institution or state university shall annually evaluate the 296 presidents on the extent to which the gender equity goals have 297 been achieved. 298 (f)âTo determine the proper level of support for womenâs 299 athletic scholarships, an equity plan may determine, where 300 appropriate, that support for womenâs scholarships may be 301 disproportionate to the support of scholarships for men. 302 (g)1.âIf a Florida College System institution is not in 303 compliance with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 and 304 the Florida Educational Equity Act, the State Board of Education 305 must shall: 306 1.a.âDeclare the Florida College System institution 307 ineligible for competitive state grants. 308 2.b.âWithhold funds sufficient to obtain compliance. 309 310 The Florida College System institution shall remain ineligible, 311 and the funds may shall not be paid until the Florida College 312 System institution comes into compliance or the Commissioner of 313 Education approves a plan for compliance. 314 (b)2.âIf a state university is not in compliance with Title 315 IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 and the Florida 316 Educational Equity Act, the Board of Governors must shall: 317 1.a.âDeclare the state university ineligible for 318 competitive state grants. 319 2.b.âWithhold funds sufficient to obtain compliance. 320 321 The state university shall remain ineligible, and the funds may 322 shall not be paid until the state university comes into 323 compliance or the Board of Governors approves a plan for 324 compliance. 325 (2)âFUNDING.â 326 (a)âAn equitable portion of all separate athletic fees 327 shall be designated for womenâs intercollegiate athletics. 328 (b)âThe level of funding and percentage share of support 329 for womenâs intercollegiate athletics for Florida College System 330 institutions shall be determined by the State Board of 331 Education. The level of funding and percentage share of support 332 for womenâs intercollegiate athletics for state universities 333 shall be determined by the Board of Governors. The level of 334 funding and percentage share attained in the 1980-1981 fiscal 335 year shall be the minimum level and percentage maintained by 336 each institution, except as the State Board of Education or the 337 Board of Governors otherwise directs its respective institutions 338 for the purpose of assuring equity. Consideration shall be given 339 by the State Board of Education or the Board of Governors to 340 emerging athletic programs at institutions which may not have 341 the resources to secure external funds to provide athletic 342 opportunities for women. It is the intent that the effect of any 343 redistribution of funds among institutions shall not negate the 344 requirements as set forth in this section. 345 (c)âIn addition to the above amount, an amount equal to the 346 sales taxes collected from admission to athletic events 347 sponsored by a state university shall be retained and utilized 348 by each university to support womenâs athletics. 349 (3)âSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION.âThe State Board of Education 350 shall assure equal opportunity for female athletes at Florida 351 College System institutions and establish: 352 (a)âGuidelines for reporting of intercollegiate athletics 353 data concerning financial, program, and facilities information 354 for review by the State Board of Education annually. 355 (b)âSystematic audits for the evaluation of such data. 356 (c)âCriteria for determining and assuring equity. 357 (4)âBOARD OF GOVERNORS.âThe Board of Governors shall ensure 358 equal opportunity for female athletes at state universities and 359 establish: 360 (a)âGuidelines for reporting of intercollegiate athletics 361 data concerning financial, program, and facilities information 362 for review by the Board of Governors annually. 363 (b)âSystematic audits for the evaluation of such data. 364 (c)âCriteria for determining and ensuring equity. 365 Section 10.âParagraph (b) of subsection (9) of section 366 1007.25, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (15) is 367 added to that section, to read: 368 1007.25âGeneral education courses; common prerequisites; 369 other degree requirements.â 370 (9) 371 (b)âAn associate in arts specialized transfer degree must 372 include 36 semester hours of general education coursework and 373 require 60 semester hours or more of college credit. Specialized 374 transfer degrees are designed for Florida College System 375 institution students who need supplemental lower-level 376 coursework in preparation for transfer to another institution. 377 The State Board of Education shall establish criteria for the 378 review and approval of new specialized transfer degrees. The 379 approval process must require: 380 1.âA Florida College System institution to submit a notice 381 of its intent to propose a new associate in arts specialized 382 degree program to the Division of Florida Colleges. The notice 383 must include the recommended credit hours, the rationale for the 384 specialization, the demand for students entering the field, and 385 the coursework being proposed to be included beyond the 60 386 semester hours required for the general transfer degree, if 387 applicable. Notices of intent may be submitted by a Florida 388 College System institution at any time. 389 2.âThe Division of Florida Colleges to forward the notice 390 of intent within 10 business days after receipt to all Florida 391 College System institutions and to the Chancellor of the State 392 University System, who shall forward the notice to all state 393 universities. State universities and Florida College System 394 institutions shall have 30 60 days after receipt of the notice 395 to submit comments to the proposed associate in arts specialized 396 transfer degree. 397 3.âAfter the submission of comments pursuant to 398 subparagraph 2., the requesting Florida College System 399 institution to submit a proposal that, at a minimum, includes: 400 a.âEvidence that the coursework for the associate in arts 401 specialized transfer degree includes demonstration of competency 402 in a foreign language pursuant to s. 1007.262 and demonstration 403 of civic literacy competency as provided in subsection (5). 404 b.âDemonstration that all required coursework will count 405 toward the associate in arts degree or the baccalaureate degree. 406 c.âAn analysis of demand and unmet need for students 407 entering the specialized field of study at the baccalaureate 408 level. 409 d.âJustification for the program length if it exceeds 60 410 credit hours, including references to the common prerequisite 411 manual or other requirements for the baccalaureate degree. This 412 includes documentation of alignment between the exit 413 requirements of a Florida College System institution and the 414 admissions requirements of a baccalaureate program at a state 415 university to which students would typically transfer. 416 e.âArticulation agreements for graduates of the associate 417 in arts specialized transfer degree. 418 f.âResponses to the comments received under subparagraph 2. 419 (15)âA Florida College System institution or state 420 university may not impose an institution-wide graduation 421 requirement that includes a course in conflict with subsection 422 (3). 423 Section 11.âSubsections (1), (16), and (18) of section 424 1007.271, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 425 1007.271âDual enrollment programs.â 426 (1)âThe dual enrollment program is the enrollment of an 427 eligible secondary student in this state or home education 428 student in this state in a postsecondary course creditable 429 toward high school completion and a career certificate or an 430 associate or baccalaureate degree. Postsecondary institutions 431 that are eligible to participate in the dual enrollment program 432 are Florida public postsecondary institutions and eligible not 433 for-profit independent colleges and universities pursuant to s. 434 1011.62(1)(i). A student who is enrolled in postsecondary 435 instruction that is not creditable toward a high school diploma 436 may not be classified as a dual enrollment student. 437 (16)âStudents who meet the eligibility requirements of this 438 section and who choose to participate in dual enrollment 439 programs are exempt from the payment of registration, tuition, 440 and laboratory fees. 441 (18)âSchool districts and postsecondary Florida College 442 System institutions shall must weigh dual enrollment courses the 443 same as advanced placement, International Baccalaureate, and 444 Advanced International Certificate of Education courses when 445 grade point averages are calculated. High school grade point 446 averages must be calculated based on the high school credit 447 earned by the student in each course. Alternative grade 448 calculation systems, alternative grade weighting systems, and 449 information regarding student education options that 450 discriminate against dual enrollment courses are prohibited. 451 Section 12.âSubsections (2) and (3) and paragraphs (a) and 452 (b) of subsection (4) of section 1008.30, Florida Statutes, are 453 amended to read: 454 1008.30âAssessing college-level communication and 455 computation skills for public postsecondary education.â 456 (2)âBy January 31, 2022, the State Board of Education shall 457 adopt rules to develop and implement alternative methods for 458 assessing the basic communication and computation skills of 459 students who intend to enter a degree program at a Florida 460 College System institution. Florida College System institutions 461 and school district career centers may use these alternative 462 methods adopted by the State Board of Education for assessing 463 the basic communication and computation skills of students who 464 intend to enter a degree program at a Florida College System 465 institution or school district career center in lieu of the 466 common placement tests under subsection (1) to assess student 467 readiness for college-level work in communication and 468 computation. Florida College System institutions may request 469 approval of institution-specific alternative methods in 470 accordance with State Board of Education rules. 471 (3)âThe rules adopted under subsection (2) must specify the 472 following: 473 (a)âA student who entered 9th grade in a Florida public 474 school in the 2003-2004 school year, or any year thereafter, and 475 earned a Florida standard high school diploma and who 476 demonstrated readiness for college-level communication and 477 computation skills by any of the approved common placement tests 478 or alternative methods pursuant to this section or a student who 479 is serving as an active duty member of any branch of the United 480 States Armed Services is not required to be assessed for 481 readiness for college-level work in communication and 482 computation and is not required to enroll in developmental 483 education instruction in a Florida College System institution or 484 a school district career center. However, a student who is not 485 required to be assessed for readiness for college-level work in 486 communication and computation and is not required to enroll in 487 developmental education under this paragraph may opt to be 488 assessed and to enroll in developmental education instruction, 489 and the college or school district career center shall provide 490 such assessment and instruction upon the studentâs request. 491 (b)âA student who earned a Florida standard high school 492 diploma and has not demonstrated readiness for college-level 493 courses pursuant to subsection (1) or subsection (2) must be 494 offered the opportunity to be is assessed for readiness for 495 college-level communication and computation and, if the 496 studentâs whose assessment results indicate a need for 497 developmental education, he or she must be advised of all the 498 developmental education options offered at the institution. and, 499 After advisement, the student may enroll in the developmental 500 education option of his or her choice. 501 (c)âA student who demonstrates readiness by achieving or 502 exceeding the test scores established under subsection (1) by 503 the state board and enrolls in a Florida College System 504 institution or a school district career center within 2 years 505 after achieving such scores may shall not be required to retest 506 or complete developmental education when admitted to any Florida 507 College System institution or school district career center. 508 (4)(a)âEach Florida College System institution and school 509 district career center shall implement the developmental 510 education strategies defined in s. 1008.02 and rules established 511 by the State Board of Education. 512 (b)âEach Florida College System institution and school 513 district career center shall use placement test results or 514 alternative methods as established by the State Board of 515 Education to determine the extent to which each student 516 demonstrates sufficient communication and computation skills to 517 indicate readiness for his or her chosen meta-major. Florida 518 College System institutions and school district career centers 519 shall counsel students into college credit courses as quickly as 520 possible, with developmental education limited to that content 521 needed for success in the meta-major. 522 Section 13.âSubsection (1) of section 1008.44, Florida 523 Statutes, is amended to read: 524 1008.44âCAPE Industry Certification Funding List.â 525 (1)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt, at least 526 annually, based upon recommendations by the Commissioner of 527 Education, the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List that 528 assigns categories of certificates and certifications as 529 provided for in s. 1003.4203 to certifications identified in the 530 Master Credentials List under s. 445.004(4) which meet a 531 statewide, regional, or local demand. Supplemental funding for 532 regional and local demand certifications may only be earned in 533 those areas with regional or local demand as identified by the 534 Credentials Review Committee. 535 Section 14.âSubsection (3) of section 1008.47, Florida 536 Statutes, is amended to read: 537 1008.47âPostsecondary education institution accreditation.â 538 (3)âPROHIBITION.âNotwithstanding any other provision of 539 law, an accrediting agency or association, including 540 programmatic accreditors, may not compel any public 541 postsecondary institution to violate state law, and any adverse 542 action upon the institution based upon the institutionâs 543 compliance with state law constitutes a violation of this 544 section that may be enforced through subsection (4), except to 545 the extent that state law is preempted by a federal law that 546 recognizes the necessity of the accreditation standard or 547 requirement. 548 Section 15.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 549 1009.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 550 1009.25âFee exemptions.â 551 (1)âThe following students are exempt from the payment of 552 tuition and fees, including lab fees, at a school district that 553 provides workforce education programs, Florida College System 554 institution, or state university: 555 (e)âA student who meets the definition of homeless children 556 and youths in s. 725 of the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance 557 Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 11434a(2), as previously determined by a 558 public school in this state, and whose physical presence is in 559 this state for the duration of the tuition and fee exemption. 560 This includes a student who would otherwise meet the 561 requirements of this paragraph, as determined by a college or 562 university, but for his or her residence in college or 563 university dormitory housing. The State Board of Education may 564 adopt rules and the Board of Governors may adopt regulations 565 regarding documentation and procedures to implement this 566 paragraph. Such rules and regulations must consider 567 documentation of a studentâs circumstance to be adequate if such 568 documentation meets the standards under 20 U.S.C. s. 1087uu 569 2(a). Any student who is determined to be a homeless child or 570 youth for a preceding award year is presumed to be a homeless 571 child or youth for each subsequent year unless the student 572 informs the institution that the studentâs circumstances have 573 changed or the institution has specific conflicting information 574 about the studentâs independence, and has informed the student 575 of this information. 576 Section 16.âParagraph (a) of subsection (20) of section 577 1009.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 578 1009.26âFee waivers.â 579 (20)(a)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 2022-2023 academic 580 year, a state university shall waive the out-of-state fee for a 581 full-time undergraduate student who: 582 1.âHas a grandparent who is a legal resident as defined in 583 s. 1009.21(1). For purposes of this subsection, the term 584 âgrandparentâ means a person who has a legal relationship to a 585 studentâs parent as the natural or adoptive parent or legal 586 guardian of the studentâs parent. 587 2.âEarns a high school diploma comparable to a Florida 588 standard high school diploma, or its equivalent, or completes a 589 home education program. 590 3.a.âAchieves an SAT combined score no lower than the 89th 591 national percentile on the SAT; or 592 b.âAchieves an ACT score concordant to the required SAT 593 score in sub-subparagraph a., using the latest published 594 national concordance table developed jointly by the College 595 Board and ACT, Inc.; or 596 c.âIf a state university accepts the Classic Learning Test 597 (CLT) for admission purposes, achieves a CLT score concordant to 598 the required SAT score specified in sub-subparagraph a., using 599 the latest published scoring comparison developed by Classic 600 Learning Initiatives. 601 4.âBeginning with students who initially enroll in the 2022 602 fall academic term and thereafter, enrolls as a full-time 603 undergraduate student at a state university in the fall academic 604 term immediately following high school graduation. 605 Section 17.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 606 1009.40, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 607 1009.40âGeneral requirements for student eligibility for 608 state financial aid awards and tuition assistance grants.â 609 (1)(a)âThe general requirements for eligibility of students 610 for state financial aid awards and tuition assistance grants 611 consist of the following: 612 1.âUnited States citizenship or lawful presence in the 613 United States. 614 2.âAchievement of the academic requirements of and 615 acceptance at a state university or Florida College System 616 institution; a nursing diploma school approved by the Florida 617 Board of Nursing; a Florida college or university which is 618 accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the State 619 Board of Education; a Florida institution the credits of which 620 are acceptable for transfer to state universities; a career 621 center; or a private career institution accredited by an 622 accrediting agency recognized by the State Board of Education. 623 3.2.âResidency in this state for no less than 1 year 624 preceding the award of aid or a tuition assistance grant for a 625 program established pursuant to s. 1009.50, s. 1009.505, s. 626 1009.51, s. 1009.52, s. 1009.521, s. 1009.53, s. 1009.60, s. 627 1009.62, s. 1009.72, s. 1009.73, s. 1009.75, s. 1009.77, s. 628 1009.89, or s. 1009.894. Residency in this state must be for 629 purposes other than to obtain an education. Resident status for 630 purposes of receiving state financial aid awards is shall be 631 determined in the same manner as resident status for tuition 632 purposes pursuant to s. 1009.21. 633 4.3.âSubmission of certification attesting to the accuracy, 634 completeness, and correctness of information provided to 635 demonstrate a studentâs eligibility to receive state financial 636 aid awards or tuition assistance grants. Falsification of such 637 information shall result in the denial of a pending application 638 and revocation of an award or grant currently held to the extent 639 that no further payments shall be made. Additionally, students 640 who knowingly make false statements in order to receive state 641 financial aid awards or tuition assistance grants commit a 642 misdemeanor of the second degree subject to the provisions of s. 643 837.06 and shall be required to return all state financial aid 644 awards or tuition assistance grants wrongfully obtained. 645 Section 18.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) and subsection 646 (2) of section 1009.536, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 647 1009.536âFlorida Gold Seal Vocational Scholars and Florida 648 Gold Seal CAPE Scholars awards.âThe Florida Gold Seal Vocational 649 Scholars award and the Florida Gold Seal CAPE Scholars award are 650 created within the Florida Bright Futures Scholarship Program to 651 recognize and reward academic achievement and career preparation 652 by high school students who wish to continue their education. 653 (1)âA student is eligible for a Florida Gold Seal 654 Vocational Scholars award if he or she meets the general 655 eligibility requirements for the Florida Bright Futures 656 Scholarship Program and: 657 (c)1.âFor a student earning a Florida Gold Seal Vocational 658 Scholars award, earns a minimum cumulative weighted grade point 659 average of 3.0, as calculated pursuant to s. 1009.531, on all 660 subjects required for a standard high school diploma, excluding 661 elective courses. 662 2.âFor students earning a Florida Gold Seal CAPE Scholars 663 award, earns a minimum cumulative weighted grade point average 664 of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale. 665 (2)(a)âA student is eligible for a Florida Gold Seal CAPE 666 Scholars award if he or she meets the general eligibility 667 requirements for the Florida Bright Futures Scholarship Program, 668 and the student does both of the following: 669 1.(a)âEarns a minimum of 3 5 postsecondary credits credit 670 hours through CAPE industry certifications approved pursuant to 671 s. 1008.44 which articulate for college credit.; and 672 2.(b)âCompletes at least 30 hours of volunteer service, or 673 75 hours of volunteer service for students entering grade 9 in 674 the 2024-2025 school year and thereafter, or 100 hours of paid 675 work, approved by the district school board, the administrators 676 of a nonpublic school, or the Department of Education for home 677 education program students, or 100 hours of a combination of 678 both. The student may identify a social or civic issue or a 679 professional area that interests him or her and develop a plan 680 for his or her personal involvement in addressing the issue or 681 learning about the area. The student must, through papers or 682 other presentations, evaluate and reflect upon his or her 683 experience. Such volunteer service or paid work may include, but 684 is not limited to, a business or governmental internship, work 685 for a nonprofit community service organization, or activities on 686 behalf of a candidate for public office. The hours of volunteer 687 service or paid work must be documented in writing, and the 688 document must be signed by the student, the studentâs parent or 689 guardian, and a representative of the organization for which the 690 student performed the volunteer service or paid work. 691 (b)âBefore or within 3 months after completion of the GATE 692 Program as provided in s. 1004.933, a student may apply for the 693 Florida Gold Seal CAPE Scholars award. 694 Section 19.âParagraph (o) is added to subsection (1) of 695 section 1011.62, Florida Statutes, to read: 696 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 697 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 698 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 699 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 700 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 701 follows: 702 (1)âCOMPUTATION OF THE BASE FLORIDA EDUCATION FINANCE 703 PROGRAM.âThe following procedure shall be followed in 704 determining the base Florida Education Finance Program funds for 705 each district: 706 (o)âCalculation of additional full-time equivalent 707 membership based on Florida advanced courses and test scores of 708 students.âA value of 0.16 full-time equivalent student 709 membership shall be calculated for each student in a Florida 710 advanced course who achieves a minimum score on an assessment 711 identified by the Department of Education pursuant to s. 712 1007.27(2) and added to the total full-time equivalent student 713 membership in basic programs for grades 9 through 12 in the 714 subsequent fiscal year. Each district shall allocate at least 80 715 percent of the funds provided to the district for Advanced 716 Placement instruction, in accordance with this paragraph, to the 717 high school that generates the funds. The school district shall 718 distribute to each classroom teacher who provided Advanced 719 Placement instruction: 720 1.âA bonus in the amount of $100 for each student taught by 721 the Florida advanced course teacher in each Florida advanced 722 course who achieves a minimum score on an assessment identified 723 by the Department of Education pursuant to s. 1007.27(2). 724 2.âAn additional bonus of $500 to each Florida advanced 725 course teacher in a school designated with a grade of âDâ or âFâ 726 who has at least one student who achieves a minimum score on an 727 assessment identified by the Department of Education pursuant to 728 s. 1007.27(2), regardless of the number of classes taught or of 729 the number of students who achieve a minimum score on an 730 assessment identified by the Department of Education pursuant to 731 s. 1007.27(2). 732 733 Bonuses awarded under this paragraph shall be in addition to any 734 regular wage or other bonus the teacher received or is scheduled 735 to receive. For such courses, the teacher shall earn an 736 additional bonus of $100 for each student who has a qualifying 737 score. 738 Section 20.âParagraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (3) of 739 section 1011.84, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 740 1011.84âProcedure for determining state financial support 741 and annual apportionment of state funds to each Florida College 742 System institution district.âThe procedure for determining state 743 financial support and the annual apportionment to each Florida 744 College System institution district authorized to operate a 745 Florida College System institution under the provisions of s. 746 1001.61 shall be as follows: 747 (3)âDETERMINING THE APPORTIONMENT FROM STATE FUNDS.â 748 (b)âThe apportionment to each Florida College System 749 institution from the Florida College System Program Fund shall 750 be determined annually in the General Appropriations Act. In 751 determining each collegeâs apportionment, the Legislature shall 752 consider the following components: 753 1.âBase budget, which includes the state appropriation to 754 the Florida College System Program Fund in the current year plus 755 the related student tuition and out-of-state fees assigned in 756 the current General Appropriations Act. 757 2.âThe cost-to-continue allocation, which consists of 758 incremental changes to the base budget, including salaries, 759 price levels, and other related costs allocated through a 760 funding model developed by the Florida College System presidents 761 in consultation with the Department of Education and approved by 762 the Legislature. The model must which may recognize a minimum 763 level of funding per FTE and differing economic factors arising 764 from the individual educational approaches of the various 765 Florida College System institutions, including, but not limited 766 to: 767 a.âProgram offerings, weighting workforce FTE to account 768 for priorities and costs Direct Instructional Funding, including 769 class size, faculty productivity factors, average faculty 770 salary, ratio of full-time to part-time faculty, costs of 771 programs, and enrollment factors. 772 b.âCompletion of credentials, including certificates, 773 certifications, and degrees Academic Support, including small 774 colleges factor, multicampus factor, and enrollment factor. 775 c.âSize of the college Student Services Support, including 776 headcount of students as well as FTE count and enrollment 777 factors. 778 d.âEconomies of scale Library Support, including volume and 779 other materials/audiovisual requirements. 780 e.âRegional cost differentials Special Projects. 781 f.âOperations and Maintenance of Plant, including square 782 footage and utilization factors. 783 g.âComparable wage factor. 784 3.âStudents enrolled in a recreation and leisure program 785 and students enrolled in a lifelong learning program who may not 786 be counted as full-time equivalent enrollments for purposes of 787 enrollment workload adjustments. 788 4.âOperating costs of new facilities adjustments, which 789 shall be provided, from funds available, for each new facility 790 that is owned by the college and is recommended in accordance 791 with s. 1013.31. 792 5.âNew and improved program enhancements, which shall be 793 determined by the Legislature. 794 795 Student fees in the base budget plus student fee revenues 796 generated by increases in fee rates shall be deducted from the 797 sum of the components determined in subparagraphs 1.-5. The 798 amount remaining shall be the net annual state apportionment to 799 each college. 800 (e)âIf at any time the unencumbered balance in the general 801 fund of the Florida College System institution board of trustees 802 approved operating budget goes below 7 5 percent for a Florida 803 College System institution with a final FTE less than 15,000 for 804 the prior year, or below 7 percent for a Florida College System 805 institution with a final FTE of 15,000 or greater for the prior 806 year, the president must shall provide written notification to 807 the State Board of Education. By September 30 of each year, the 808 chief financial officer of each Florida College System 809 institution shall certify the unexpended amount of state funds 810 remaining in the general fund of an institution as of June 30 of 811 the previous fiscal year. 812 Section 21.âSubsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 813 1013.841, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 814 1013.841âEnd of year balance of Florida College System 815 institution funds.â 816 (2)(a)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 817 FTE less than 15,000 for the prior year shall maintain a minimum 818 carry forward balance of at least 7 5 percent of its state 819 operating budget; however, a Florida College System institution 820 may retain and report to the State Board of Education an annual 821 reserve balance exceeding that amount. If a Florida College 822 System institution fails to maintain a 7 5 percent balance in 823 state operating funds, the president must shall provide written 824 notification to the State Board of Education. 825 (b)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 826 FTE less than 15,000 for the prior year that retains a state 827 operating fund carry forward balance in excess of the 7 5 828 percent minimum shall submit a spending plan for its excess 829 carry forward balance. The spending plan must shall include all 830 excess carry forward funds from state operating funds. The 831 spending plan must shall be submitted to the Florida College 832 System institutionâs board of trustees for approval by September 833 30 of each year, 2020, and each September 30 thereafter. The 834 State Board of Education shall review and publish each Florida 835 College System institutionâs carry forward spending plan by 836 November 15 of each year, 2020, and each November 15 thereafter. 837 (3)(a)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 838 FTE of 15,000 or greater for the prior year shall maintain a 839 minimum carry forward balance of at least 7 percent of its state 840 operating budget. If a Florida College System institution fails 841 to maintain a 7 percent balance in state operating funds, the 842 institution shall submit a plan to the State Board of Education 843 to attain the minimum balance. 844 (b)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 845 FTE of 15,000 or greater for the prior year that retains a state 846 operating fund carry forward balance in excess of the 7 percent 847 minimum shall submit a spending plan for its excess carry 848 forward balance. The spending plan shall include all excess 849 carry forward funds from state operating funds. The spending 850 plan shall be submitted to the Florida College System 851 institutionâs board of trustees for approval by September 30, 852 2020, and each September 30 thereafter. The State Board of 853 Education shall review and publish each Florida College System 854 institutionâs carry forward spending plan by November 15, 2020, 855 and each November 15 thereafter. 856 (4)âA Florida College System institution identified in 857 paragraph (2)(b) (3)(b) must include in its carry forward 858 spending plan the estimated cost per planned expenditure and a 859 timeline for completion of the expenditure. A carry forward 860 spending plan may include retention of the carry forward balance 861 as a reserve fund to be used for authorized expenses in 862 subsequent years. Authorized expenditures in a carry forward 863 spending plan may include: 864 (a)âCommitment of funds to a public education capital 865 outlay project for which an appropriation was previously 866 provided, which requires additional funds for completion, and 867 which is included in the list required by s. 1001.03(18)(d); 868 (b)âCompletion of a renovation, repair, or maintenance 869 project that is consistent with s. 1013.64(1) or replacement of 870 a minor facility; 871 (c)âCompletion of a remodeling or infrastructure project, 872 if such project is survey recommended pursuant to s. 1013.31; 873 (d)âCompletion of a repair or replacement project necessary 874 due to damage caused by a natural disaster for buildings 875 included in the inventory required pursuant to s. 1013.31; 876 (e)âOperating expenditures that support the Florida College 877 System institutionâs mission; 878 (f)âAny purpose approved by the state board or specified in 879 the General Appropriations Act; and 880 (g)âA commitment of funds to a contingency reserve for 881 expenses incurred as a result of a state of emergency declared 882 by the Governor pursuant to s. 252.36. 883 Section 22.âSubsection (2) of section 1009.895, Florida 884 Statutes, is amended to read: 885 1009.895âOpen Door Grant Program.â 886 (2)âELIGIBILITY.âIn order to be eligible for the program, a 887 student must: 888 (a)âMeet the requirements under s. 1009.40(1)(a)3. and 4. 889 s. 1009.40(1)(a)2. and 3.; 890 (b)âBe enrolled in an adult secondary education program or 891 an integrated education and training program in which 892 institutions establish partnerships with local workforce 893 development boards to provide basic skills instruction, 894 contextually and concurrently, with workforce training that 895 results in the award of credentials under s. 445.004(4) or a 896 workforce education program as defined under s. 1011.80(1)(b) 897 (f) that is included on the Master Credentials List under s. 898 445.004(4); and 899 (c)âBe enrolled at a school district postsecondary 900 technical career center under s. 1001.44, a Florida College 901 System institution under s. 1000.21(5), or a charter technical 902 career center under s. 1002.34. 903 904 An institution may not impose additional criteria to determine a 905 studentâs eligibility to receive a grant under this section. 906 Section 23.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.